Delaware, session 153, HB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4137A, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows and by redesignating Delaware Code provisions accordingly: Â§ 4137A. Free School Meals Program . (a) Definitions. â As used in For purposes of this section: (1) âBreakfastâ means as defined in 7 C.F.R. Â§ 220.2. (1) (2) âDepartmentâ means the Department of Education. (3) âEligible mealâ means breakfast or lunch satisfying Program requirements. (4) âLunchâ means as defined in 7 C.F.R. Â§ 210.2. (2) (5) âNational School Lunch Programâ means the federal Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act created in 42 U.S.C.Â§ 1751 et seq. (3) (6) âProgramâ means the Free School Meals Program created under this section. (4) âReduced-price mealâ means a meal a child is entitled to receive under the School Breakfast Program or National School Lunch Program when the familyâs income is between 130% and 185% of the federal poverty threshold, as published annually in the Federal Register, and as required under Â§ 9 of the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. Â§ 1758. (5) (7) âSchool Breakfast Programâ means the federal School Breakfast Program created in 42 U.S.C. Â§ 1773 et seq. (b) All public schools that participate in the School Breakfast Program and National School Lunch Program must provide a breakfast meal and a lunch meal free of charge to any student who qualifies for a reduced-price meal with a maximum of 1 free meal for each meal service period. The meals provided free of charge under this Program must meet the meal pattern requirements under the School Breakfast Program and National School Lunch Program. Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a public school that participates in the School Breakfast Program shall make available a breakfast free of charge to any attending student, regardless of household income. (c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a public school that participates in the National School Lunch Program shall make available a lunch free of charge to any attending student, regardless of household income. (d) A student may receive a maximum of 1 free meal for each meal service period. (c) (e) The Department shall reimburse all public schools participating in the Program. The amount of reimbursement, by the Department that the Department reimburses to each participating public school for each budget year, year will be equal to the federal free reimbursement rate multiplied by the total number of eligible meals that the participating public school serves during the applicable budget year minus the total amount of reimbursement for eligible meals served during the applicable budget year that the participating public school receives under the School Breakfast Program and National School Lunch Program. Section 2. This Act takes effect 30 days following the date of publication in the Register of Regulations of a notice by the Controller General that funds have been appropriated to implement the provisions of this Act.